Wyoming, session 2026, HB0190.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-8-1205 is created to read:
HB0190

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0407

36-8-1205. Transfer of land to the department of
state parks and cultural resources.

The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed
to convey its right, title and interest in the following
described parcels of land to the department of state parks
and cultural resources for development as a state park
following the completion of the site criteria process
pursuant to W.S. 36-4-106 and 36-4-108: in Natrona county,
that part of Lots 1, 2, 3 and 4, E2W2:NE:N2SE:SWSE of
Section 31, Township 33 North, Range 79 West containing six
hundred (600) acres; Section 36, Township 33 North, Range
80 West containing six hundred forty (640.00) acres; that
part of E2 of section 30, Township 33 North, Range 79 West
containing three hundred twenty (320.00) acres; that part
of SW:W2SE:SESE:W2NESE:SENESE of Section 35, Township 33
North, Range 80 West containing three hundred ten (310.00)
acres; that part of NW:S2 of Section 34, Township 33 North,
Range 80 West containing four hundred eighty (480.00)
acres; that part of E2E2 of Section 33, Township 33 North,
Range 80 West containing one hundred sixty (160.00) acres;
that part of Lots 1 and 2, SENW:E2SW:NESE:S2SE of Section
HB0190

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0407
2, Township 32 North, Range 80 West containing three
hundred seventeen and eighty-two hundredths (317.82) acres;
and that part of Lots 2, 3 and 4, S2N2:SE:SESW:SWSW:NESW of
Section 1, Township 32 North, Range 80 West containing five
hundred fifty-three and forty-five hundredths (553.45)
acres, subject to any rights-of-way or other easements as
granted or reserved by instruments of record or as now
exists thereon.

Section 2. The board of land commissioners shall
initiate the transfer of land to the department of state
parks and cultural resources as required by section 1 of
this act, subject to section 3 of this act, not later than
July 1, 2027.

Section 3.

(a) The board of land commissioners may use a portion
of the funds appropriated in section 5 of this act to
negotiate the disposition of any mineral leases currently
encumbering the property described in section 1 of this act
as necessary to effectuate the transfer of lands authorized
in this act.
HB0190

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0407

(b) The transfer of lands authorized in this act
shall be by sale at fair market value as determined by an
appraisal, and funds from the sale shall be transferred
into the common school account within the permanent land
fund.

Section 4. The department of state parks and cultural
resources shall initiate the site criteria process as
required by this act not later than one (1) year following
the transfer of land as required by sections 1 and 2 of
this act and provide a report on the site criteria process
for the lands described in section 1 of this act to the
joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources
interim committee not later than October 1, 2027.

Section 5. There is appropriated six million five
hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000.00) from the general
fund to the department of state parks and cultural
resources for purposes of the procurement of the parcels of
land and lease disposition as specified in this act. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This
HB0190

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0407
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
standard budget of the department of state parks and
cultural resources for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0190